Utah statutes.
76-8-701.   Definitions.

For the purposes of this part:

(1)  "Chief administrative officer" means the president of an institution of higher education or a person designated by the president.

(2)  "Enter" means intrusion of the entire body.

(3)  "Institution" or "institution of higher education" means:

(a)  a state institution of higher education as defined in Section 53B-3-102; or

(b)  a private institution of higher education in the state accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 257, 2013 General Session

